Louisiana, session 2026, HB720.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 48:491(B)(1)(c) and (2) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
48:491(B)(3) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§491. Public roads
* * *
B.(1)
* * *
(c) Actual or constructive knowledge is conclusively presumed within all
parishes and municipalities, except as otherwise provided by R.S. 48:491(B)(3), if
the total period of such maintenance is four years or more, unless prior thereto and
within sixty days of such actual or constructive knowledge, the prescription is
interrupted or suspended in any manner provided by law.
(2)(a) Any tacit dedication of a road or street pursuant to Paragraph (1) of
this Subsection shall remain in force and effect and the right-of-way for such public
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 720 ENROLLED
road or street shall be subject to public use until the parish or municipality who has
maintained it formally revokes the dedication.
(b) Public works and improvements constructed in the right-of-way of a road
or street tacitly dedicated pursuant to Paragraph (1) of this Subsection shall likewise
remain subject to public use unless disposed of in accordance with applicable law by
the parish or municipality. This Subparagraph shall include any boat launches, boat
landings, and parking areas that have been constructed and maintained by the parish
or municipality.
(c) A tacitly dedicated public road or street, and the right-of-way therefore,
are not susceptible of alienation through private sale by adjoining landowners or
landowners who maintain ownership of the property beneath the public right-of-way.
(2) (3) When a local governing authority for any reason decides to dispose
of any road, street, or property used for right-of-way purposes which was originally
donated or tacitly dedicated to the authority or its ancestor in title, the property shall
revert to the original donor or his heirs or assigns. The authority shall notify the
donor or his heirs of its intention to donate the property by sending written notice via
certified mail, return receipt requested, to the donor or his heirs at his last known
address. The notice shall inform the donor or his heirs or his assigns of the
authority's intention to have the land revert and provide him ninety days from receipt
in which to respond. If, upon the expiration of the ninety-day period, no response
has been received by the authority, it shall dispose of the property in accordance with
applicable law. In the donation deed from the authority to the donor or his heirs or
his assigns, the authority shall reserve rights of passage for landowners who own
property contiguous to the property to be reverted.
* * *
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 720 ENROLLED
Section 2. The provisions of this Act are remedial, procedural, and interpretive of
existing law and shall be given prospective and retroactive application.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.